New Jersey, session 222, A2224.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    The Division of Medical Assistance and Health Services in the Department of Human Services shall provide coverage for emergency contraceptives without requiring a prescription or other authorization for the emergency contraception product.  The division shall require each Medicaid managed care organization to include as a benefit in the Medicaid managed care contract coverage for emergency contraceptives without requiring a prescription or other authorization for the emergency contraception product. Authorization means a fiscal order or any other approval or order from a health care professional. Medicaid managed care contract means a contract for the provision of health care services by a managed care organization to individuals eligible for the Medicaid program pursuant to P.L.1968, c.413 (C.30:4D-1 et seq.) or the NJ FamilyCare program pursuant to P.L.2005, c.156 (C.30:4J-8 et al.). 2.    The Commissioner of Human Services shall apply for such State plan amendments or waivers as may be necessary to implement the provisions of this act and to secure federal financial participation for State Medicaid expenditures under the federal Medicaid program. 3.    The Commissioner of Human Services shall adopt rules and regulations pursuant to the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), to effectuate the purposes of this act. 4.    This act shall take effect immediately, notwithstanding any federal approval.